Utah statutes.
78A-7-301.   Justice Court Technology, Security, and Training Account
established -- Funding -- Uses.
There is created a restricted account in the General Fund known as the Justice
Court Technology, Security, and Training Account.
(1)  The state treasurer shall deposit in the account monies collected from
the surcharge established in Subsection 78A-6-122(3)(b)(iii).
(2)  Monies shall be appropriated from the account to the Administrative
Office of the Courts to only be used for technology, security, and training
needs in justice courts throughout the state.
